Washington statutes.
RCW 32.04.010

Scope of title.

This title shall not be construed as amending or repealing any other law of the state authorizing the incorporation of banks or regulating the same, but shall be deemed to be additional legislation for the sole purpose of authorizing the incorporation and operation of mutual savings banks and mutual savings banks converted under chapter 32.32 RCW to stock form, as herein prescribed. Savings banks incorporated on the stock plan, other than converted mutual savings banks, and other stock banks having savings departments as authorized by *RCW 30.20.060, or by any other law of the state heretofore or hereafter enacted, shall not be in any manner affected by the provisions of this title, or any amendment thereto.

[ 1981 c 85 s 105; 1955 c 13 s 32.04.010. Prior: 1915 c 175 s 52; RRS s 3381.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30.20.060 was recodified as RCW 30A.20.060 pursuant to 2014 c 37 s 4, effective January 5, 2015.